District of Columbia statutes.
49-201

Issuance by Department of Army.

The uniforms, arms, and equipments of the National Guard shall as far as practicable be the same as prescribed and furnished to the regular Army. Every organization of the National Guard shall be provided with such ordnance and ordnance stores, clothing, camp and garrison equipage, quartermaster’s stores, medical supplies, and other military stores, as may be necessary for the proper training and instruction of the force and for the proper performance of the duties required under this chapter. Such property shall be issued from the stores and supplies appropriated for the use of the Army, upon the approval and by the direction of the Secretary of the Army, to the Commanding General, upon his requisitions for the same. The property so issued shall remain and continue to be the property of the United States, and shall be accounted for by the Commanding General at such times, in manner, and on such forms as the Secretary of the Army may require.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 776, ch. 328, § 31
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 632, ch. 146, § 29

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-201.
1973 Ed., § 39-501.